Missouri, session 2026, HB2516.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 630.140, RSMo, is repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 630.140, 632.180, and 632.322, to read as follows:
630.140. 1. Information and records compiled, obtained, prepared or maintained by
the residential facility, mental health program operated, funded or licensed by the department
or otherwise, specialized service, or by any mental health facility or mental health program in
which people may be civilly detained pursuant to chapter 632 in the course of providing
services to either voluntary or involuntary patients, residents or clients shall be confidential.
2. The facilities or programs shall disclose information and records including
medication given, dosage levels, and individual ordering such medication to the following
upon their request:
(1) The parent of a minor patient, resident or client;
(2) The guardian or other person having legal custody of the patient, resident or
client;
(3) The attorney of a patient, resident or client who is a ward of the juvenile court, an
alleged incompetent, an incompetent ward or a person detained under chapter 632, as
evidenced by court orders of the attorney's appointment;
(4) An attorney or personal physician as authorized by the patient, resident or client;
(5) Law enforcement officers and agencies, information about patients, residents or
clients committed pursuant to chapter 552, but only to the extent necessary to carry out the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2516 2
responsibilities of their office, and all such law enforcement officers shall be obligated to
keep such information confidential;
(6) The entity or agency authorized to implement a system to protect and advocate the
rights of persons with developmental disabilities under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. Sections
15042 to 15044. The entity or agency shall be able to obtain access to the records of a person
with developmental disabilities who is a client of the entity or agency if such person has
authorized the entity or agency to have such access; and the records of any person with
developmental disabilities who, by reason of mental or physical condition is unable to
authorize the entity or agency to have such access, if such person does not have a legal
guardian, conservator or other legal representative, and a complaint has been received by the
entity or agency with respect to such person or there is probable cause to believe that such
person has been subject to abuse or neglect. The entity or agency obtaining access to a
person's records shall meet all requirements for confidentiality as set out in this section;
(7) The entity or agency authorized to implement a system to protect and advocate the
rights of persons with mental illness under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. Section 10801 et seq.,
as amended, shall be able to obtain access to the records of a patient, resident or client who by
reason of mental or physical condition is unable to authorize the system to have such access,
who does not have a legal guardian, conservator or other legal representative and with respect
to whom a complaint has been received by the system or there is probable cause to believe
that such individual has been subject to abuse or neglect. The entity or agency obtaining
access to a person's records shall meet all requirements for confidentiality as set out in this
section. The provisions of this subdivision shall apply to a person who has a significant
mental illness or impairment as determined by a mental health professional qualified under
the laws and regulations of the state; [and]
(8) To individuals, designated by the department of mental health as community
mental health liaisons, for the purpose of coordination of care and services; and
(9) A qualified family advocate entitled to the records under section 632.322.
3. The facilities or services may disclose information and records under any of the
following:
(1) As authorized by the patient, resident or client;
(2) To persons or agencies responsible for providing health care services to such
patients, residents or clients as permitted by the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA), as amended;
(3) To the extent necessary for a recipient to make a claim or for a claim to be made
on behalf of a recipient for aid or insurance;
(4) To qualified personnel for the purpose of conducting scientific research,
management audits, financial audits, program evaluations or similar studies; provided, that

HB 2516 3
such personnel shall not identify, directly or indirectly, any individual patient, resident or
client in any report of such research, audit or evaluation, or otherwise disclose patient,
resident or client identities in any manner;
(5) To the courts as necessary for the administration of chapter 211, 475, 552, or 632;
(6) To law enforcement officers or public health officers, but only to the extent
necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their office, and all such law enforcement and
public health officers shall be obligated to keep such information confidential;
(7) Pursuant to an order of a court or administrative agency of competent jurisdiction;
(8) To the attorney representing petitioners, but only to the extent necessary to carry
out their duties under chapter 632;
(9) To the department of social services or the department of health and senior
services as necessary to report or have investigated abuse, neglect, or rights violations of
patients, residents, or clients;
(10) To a county board established pursuant to sections 205.968 to 205.973, but only
to the extent necessary to carry out their statutory responsibilities. The county board shall not
identify, directly or indirectly, any individual patient, resident or client;
(11) To parents, legal guardians, treatment professionals, law enforcement officers,
and other individuals who by having such information could mitigate the likelihood of a
suicide. The facility treatment team shall have determined that the consumer's safety is at
some level of risk;
(12) To individuals, designated by the department of mental health as community
mental health liaisons, for the purpose of coordination of care and services.
4. The facility or program shall document the dates, nature, purposes and recipients of
any records disclosed under this section and sections 630.145 and 630.150.
5. The records and files maintained in any court proceeding under chapter 632 shall
be confidential and available only to the patient, the patient's attorney, guardian, or, in the
case of a minor, to a parent or other person having legal custody of the patient, to the
petitioner and the petitioner's attorney, and to the Missouri state highway patrol for reporting
to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS), and to individuals
designated by the department of mental health as community mental health liaisons for the
purpose of coordination of care and services. In addition, the court may order the release or
use of such records or files only upon good cause shown, and the court may impose such
restrictions as the court deems appropriate.
6. Nothing contained in this chapter shall limit the rights of discovery in judicial or
administrative procedures as otherwise provided for by statute or rule.

HB 2516 4
7. The fact of admission of a voluntary or involuntary patient to a mental health
facility under chapter 632 may only be disclosed as specified in subsections 2 and 3 of this
section.
632.180. 1. This section and section 632.322 shall be known and may be cited as
the "Family Mental Health Advocacy and Patient Rights Act".
2. All individuals admitted, detained, or evaluated under this chapter shall have
the right to:
(1) Dignity and humane treatment;
(2) A responsible advocate when unable to self-advocate;
(3) Clear explanation of diagnosis, treatment, and medication;
(4) Participation in care decisions to the fullest extent possible;
(5) Safe and coordinated discharge planning with outpatient providers and
household family members when applicable; and
(6) A rapid appeal process for involuntary detention, denial of family access, and
premature discharge.
3. Mental health facilities shall post these rights in a conspicuous location and
provide them in writing at the time of evaluation or admission.
4. (1) Compliance with this section shall be required under the licensing
regulations applicable to mental health facilities, and a violation of this section shall be
grounds for any administrative action authorized for violations of such regulations.
(2) The department of mental health shall investigate any complaints alleging
violations of the rights described in this section and issue orders for corrective actions or
impose any other appropriate administrative sanctions for such violations.
5. The department of mental health shall promulgate rules to implement this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
632.322. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Capacity", the ability of an individual to understand treatment information,
communicate decisions, and act in the individual's own best interests;

HB 2516 5
(2) "Incapacitated", the temporary inability of an individual to understand
treatment information, communicate decisions, and act in the individual's own best
interests;
(3) "Qualified family advocate", an individual who:
(a) Is eighteen years of age or older;
(b) Is related to the respondent within the first degree of consanguinity or
affinity;
(c) Has resided in the same household as the respondent for a period of at least
thirty consecutive days before the date the respondent was detained for evaluation and
treatment at a mental health facility; and
(d) Is not subject to any active order of protection or substantiated finding of
abuse.
2. A rebuttable presumption that an individual is incapacitated shall
automatically apply upon:
(1) Detention of the individual for evaluation and treatment at a mental health
facility under section 632.305; or
(2) A finding that the individual meets the criteria for emergency psychiatric
evaluation due to risk of harm to self or others.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any detention of a respondent for
evaluation and treatment under section 632.305 shall automatically entitle a qualified
family advocate to the access and participation described in subsection 4 of this section
without requiring additional capacity findings until reevaluation of the respondent.
Only one individual shall be designated as the qualified family advocate for the
respondent. If more than one family member meets the definition of qualified family
advocate, the family members shall select one individual to serve as the qualified family
advocate for the respondent.
4. Upon detention of the respondent, the qualified family advocate for the
respondent shall be granted:
(1) Access to treatment information necessary for safety, medication decisions,
discharge planning, and continuity of care; and
(2) Participation in treatment team meetings, including care plans, medication
changes, risk assessments, and discharge or transfer decisions.
5. Upon documented restoration of capacity of the respondent, the qualified
family advocate's access and participation under this section shall end, provided that the
qualified family advocate shall receive notification before the respondent's release from
detention.

HB 2516 6
6. A mental health facility shall not implement a blanket policy prohibiting
family participation or cite confidentiality laws as the basis for denying the access or
participation described in this section when the conditions of this section have been
satisfied.
7. (1) Compliance with this section shall be required under the licensing
regulations applicable to mental health facilities, and a violation of this section shall be
grounds for any administrative action authorized for violations of such regulations.
(2) The department of mental health shall investigate any complaints alleging
violations of this section and issue orders for corrective actions or impose any other
appropriate administrative sanctions for such violations.
8. The department of mental health shall promulgate rules to implement this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔